Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA FINANCIAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services must establish a direct cash assistance grant pilot program to provide regular and predictable financial support to eligible Minnesota residents to promote economic stability, workforce participation, and community investment and to support a recipient's basic needs. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible grantees. new text end new text begin An eligible grantee must be able to provide monthly payments to eligible recipients and be a local government entity, Tribal government, or nonprofit organization with a demonstrated track record in community development and economic assistance. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Applications. new text end new text begin An application for a financial opportunity grant must include: new text end new text begin (1) an initial program design and proposal meeting the requirements of subdivisions 4 and 6; new text end new text begin (2) a plan to identify eligible recipients the applicant intends to serve under this section; new text end new text begin (3) a rationale for identifying the specific eligible recipients; new text end new text begin (4) a plan for involving impacted community members in the design of the program; new text end new text begin (5) a commitment to participate in the financial opportunity community of practice under subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (6) a commitment to cooperate with an evaluator selected by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (7) a plan for collecting the data required in the report under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant activities. new text end new text begin Grantees must use the grant money to: new text end new text begin (1) design and implement a financial opportunity disbursement program based on the needs of the impacted community that meets the requirements of this section; new text end new text begin (2) provide a monthly payment of at least $500 each month to eligible recipients under this section for a period of at least 18 months; and new text end new text begin (3) collect the information required for the report under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Stipends not to be considered income. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, cash stipends under this section must not be considered income, assets, or personal property for purposes of determining eligibility or recertifying eligibility for: new text end new text begin (1) child care assistance programs under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142E; new text end new text begin (2) food support under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142F; new text end new text begin (3) the Minnesota family investment program and diversionary work program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142G; new text end new text begin (4) general assistance and Minnesota supplemental aid under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256D; new text end new text begin (5) housing support under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256I; and new text end new text begin (6) economic assistance programs under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 256P. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not consider cash stipends under this section as income or assets for medical assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.056, subdivision 1a, paragraph (a); 3; or 3c. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible to receive monthly payments under this section, a recipient must attest to the recipient's need and must be receiving public benefits or have a household income less than or equal to 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. Once enrolled, recipients must not be required to recertify. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible recipient may be an individual or a family. new text end new text begin (c) Grantees may identify priority populations, including but not limited to families; individuals or youth at risk of or experiencing homelessness; individuals with low income wanting to acquire more training, job skills, or education; or individuals and families who have recently relocated to Minnesota from other states or countries. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Financial opportunity community of practice. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a financial opportunity community of practice to provide regular training and technical assistance to grantees. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must identify at least one independent entity to lead the financial opportunity community of practice under this subdivision and to provide training and technical assistance to grantees. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Each grantee must collect data from its recipients before and after participation in the program on the following: new text end new text begin (1) economic status; new text end new text begin (2) employment status; new text end new text begin (3) status of physical and mental health; new text end new text begin (4) status of food and housing security; new text end new text begin (5) ability to enroll in further education due to participation in the program; and new text end new text begin (6) any other relevant information identified by the grantee. new text end new text begin (b) Grantees must provide an annual report to the commissioner on the data collected under paragraph (a) in a manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Evaluator. new text end new text begin The commissioner must identify at least one independent, research-based entity to evaluate the program under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in cooperation with grantees under this section, must submit a final report on findings regarding the efficacy and cost-effectiveness of the Minnesota financial opportunity grant pilot program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services by January 15, 2028. The report must maintain the anonymity of individuals who participate in the program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA FINANCIAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the Minnesota financial opportunity grant pilot program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (a), the commissioner of human services may use up to $....... for outreach, technical assistance, training, and evaluation. new text end